02_Morphology/grn.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%>	! Start of the morpheme
%<nom%>	! Noun
%<gen%>	! Genitive
%<loc%>	! Locative
%{m%} ! Multicharacter symbol
%<der_kue%> ! Nominal Past
%<der_icha%> ! Comparative
%<pl%> ! Plural
%{g%} ! Surface g
%{n%} ! nasal

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;

LEXICON N

%<n%>: CASE ;
%<n%>: SUBST ;
%<n%>: PL;

LEXICON PL
%<pl%>:%>%{n%}%{g%}uéra CASE ;
LEXICON CASE

%<nom%>: # ; ! ""
%<gen%>:%>gui # ; ! "de"
%<loc%>:%>{m%}e # ; ! "a, en"
# ;

LEXICON SUBST

%<der_kue%>:%>kue # "weight: 1.0" ;
%<der_icha%>:%>icha # ; ! "like"

LEXICON Nouns

ava:ava N ; ! "raza, gente"
óga:óga N ; ! "casa"
irũ:irũ N ; ! "amigo"
apyka:apyka N ; ! "silla"
akãvai:akãvai N ; ! "locura"
tembiasa:tembiasa N ; ! "experiencia"
